Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2711
Employee rights and responsibilities; notice required.

(1) By December 31, 2005, the Public Counsel shall prepare for agencies a written notice of the rights and responsibilities of employees under the State Government Effectiveness Act. By January 31, 2006, the Public Counsel shall distribute the written notice to each agency.

(2) Beginning January 31, 2006, each agency shall post the notice in a conspicuous manner at the place of employment. Each agency shall inform its employees of their rights and responsibilities under the State Government Effectiveness Act by distributing the notice to each employee in print or electronic format.

Laws 2005, LB 475, § 1.